Massachusetts, session 194th, H2779.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The definition of “Regular Compensation” as defined in section 1 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “firefighters,” in line 453, the following:- “employees of the Massachusetts Water
Resources Authority.”
of 1